Illinois, session 104th, HB1776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 10-1-7 and 10-2.1-6 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/10-1-7)  (from Ch. 24, par. 10-1-7)7    Sec. 10-1-7. Examination of applicants; disqualifications. 8    (a) All applicants for offices or places in the classified 9service, except those mentioned in Section 10-1-17, are 10subject to examination. The examination shall be public, 11competitive, and open to all citizens of the United States, 12with specified limitations as to residence, age, health, 13habits, and moral character. An individual who is legally 14authorized to work in the United States under federal law is 15authorized to apply for the position of firefighter, subject 16to all requirements and limitations, other than citizenship, 17to which other applicants are subject. An individual who is 18not a citizen but is legally authorized to work in the United 19States under federal law or is an individual against whom 20immigration action has been deferred by the U.S. Citizenship 21and Immigration Services under the federal Deferred Action for 22Childhood Arrivals (DACA) process is authorized to apply for 23the position of police officer, subject to (i) all   HB1776- 2 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1requirements and limitations, other than citizenship, to which 2other applicants are subject and (ii) the individual being 3authorized under federal law to obtain, carry, or purchase or 4otherwise possess a firearm. 5    (b) Residency requirements in effect at the time an 6individual enters the fire or police service of a municipality 7(other than a municipality that has more than 1,000,000 8inhabitants) cannot be made more restrictive for that 9individual during his or her period of service for that 10municipality, or be made a condition of promotion, except for 11the rank or position of Fire or Police Chief. 12    (c) No person with a record of misdemeanor convictions 13except those under Sections 11-1.50, 11-6, 11-7, 11-9, 11-14, 1411-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 11-30, 11-35, 12-2, 12-6, 12-15, 1514-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 31-4, 1631-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, and 32-8, subdivisions 17(a)(1) and (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, and paragraphs (1), 18(6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the Criminal 19Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or arrested for any 20cause but not convicted on that cause shall be disqualified 21from taking the examination on grounds of habits or moral 22character, unless the person is attempting to qualify for a 23position on the police department, in which case the 24conviction or arrest may be considered as a factor in 25determining the person's habits or moral character.26    (d) Persons entitled to military preference under Section   HB1776- 3 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b110-1-16 shall not be subject to limitations specifying age 2unless they are applicants for a position as a fireman or a 3policeman having no previous employment status as a fireman or 4policeman in the regularly constituted fire or police 5department of the municipality, in which case they must not 6have attained their 35th birthday, except any person who has 7served as an auxiliary police officer under Section 3.1-30-20 8for at least 5 years and is under 40 years of age. 9    (e) All employees of a municipality of less than 500,000 10population (except those who would be excluded from the 11classified service as provided in this Division 1) who are 12holding that employment as of the date a municipality adopts 13this Division 1, or as of July 17, 1959, whichever date is the 14later, and who have held that employment for at least 2 years 15immediately before that later date, and all firemen and 16policemen regardless of length of service who were either 17appointed to their respective positions by the board of fire 18and police commissioners under the provisions of Division 2 of 19this Article or who are serving in a position (except as a 20temporary employee) in the fire or police department in the 21municipality on the date a municipality adopts this Division 221, or as of July 17, 1959, whichever date is the later, shall 23become members of the classified civil service of the 24municipality without examination.25    (f) The examinations shall be practical in their 26character, and shall relate to those matters that will fairly   HB1776- 4 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1test the relative capacity of the persons examined to 2discharge the duties of the positions to which they seek to be 3appointed. The examinations shall include tests of physical 4qualifications, health, and (when appropriate) manual skill. 5If an applicant is unable to pass the physical examination 6solely as the result of an injury received by the applicant as 7the result of the performance of an act of duty while working 8as a temporary employee in the position for which he or she is 9being examined, however, the physical examination shall be 10waived and the applicant shall be considered to have passed 11the examination. No questions in any examination shall relate 12to political or religious opinions or affiliations. Results of 13examinations and the eligible registers prepared from the 14results shall be published by the commission within 60 days 15after any examinations are held.16    (g) The commission shall control all examinations, and 17may, whenever an examination is to take place, designate a 18suitable number of persons, either in or not in the official 19service of the municipality, to be examiners. The examiners 20shall conduct the examinations as directed by the commission 21and shall make a return or report of the examinations to the 22commission. If the appointed examiners are in the official 23service of the municipality, the examiners shall not receive 24extra compensation for conducting the examinations unless the 25examiners are subject to a collective bargaining agreement 26with the municipality. The commission may at any time   HB1776- 5 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1substitute any other person, whether or not in the service of 2the municipality, in the place of any one selected as an 3examiner. The commission members may themselves at any time 4act as examiners without appointing examiners. The examiners 5at any examination shall not all be members of the same 6political party.7    (h) In municipalities of 500,000 or more population, no 8person who has attained his or her 35th birthday shall be 9eligible to take an examination for a position as a fireman or 10a policeman unless the person has had previous employment 11status as a policeman or fireman in the regularly constituted 12police or fire department of the municipality, except as 13provided in this Section.14    (i) In municipalities of more than 5,000 but not more than 15200,000 inhabitants, no person who has attained his or her 1635th birthday shall be eligible to take an examination for a 17position as a fireman or a policeman unless the person has had 18previous employment status as a policeman or fireman in the 19regularly constituted police or fire department of the 20municipality, except as provided in this Section.21    (j) In all municipalities, applicants who are 20 years of 22age and who have successfully completed 2 years of law 23enforcement studies at an accredited college or university may 24be considered for appointment to active duty with the police 25department. An applicant described in this subsection (j) who 26is appointed to active duty shall not have power of arrest, nor   HB1776- 6 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1shall the applicant be permitted to carry firearms, until he 2or she reaches 21 years of age.3    (k) In municipalities of more than 500,000 population, 4applications for examination for and appointment to positions 5as firefighters or police shall be made available at various 6branches of the public library of the municipality.7    (l) No municipality having a population less than 81,000,000 shall require that any fireman appointed to the 9lowest rank serve a probationary employment period of longer 10than one year. The limitation on periods of probationary 11employment provided in Public Act 86-990 is an exclusive power 12and function of the State. Pursuant to subsection (h) of 13Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution, a home 14rule municipality having a population less than 1,000,000 must 15comply with this limitation on periods of probationary 16employment, which is a denial and limitation of home rule 17powers. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 18Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 19extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 20employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 21sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 22hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 23licensure.24    (m) To the extent that this Section or any other Section in 25this Division conflicts with Section 10-1-7.1 or 10-1-7.2, 26then Section 10-1-7.1 or 10-1-7.2 shall control.  HB1776- 7 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1(Source: P.A. 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-357, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-6)  (from Ch. 24, par. 10-2.1-6)3    Sec. 10-2.1-6. Examination of applicants; 4disqualifications. 5    (a) All applicants for a position in either the fire or 6police department of the municipality shall be under 35 years 7of age, shall be subject to an examination that shall be 8public, competitive, and open to all applicants (unless the 9council or board of trustees by ordinance limit applicants to 10electors of the municipality, county, state, or nation) and 11shall be subject to reasonable limitations as to residence, 12health, habits, and moral character. An individual who is 13legally authorized to work in the United States under federal 14law is authorized to apply for the position of firefighter, 15subject to all requirements and limitations, other than 16citizenship, to which other applicants are subject. An 17individual who is not a citizen but is legally authorized to 18work in the United States under federal law or is an individual 19against whom immigration action has been deferred by the U.S. 20Citizenship and Immigration Services under the federal 21Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) process is 22authorized to apply for the position of police officer, 23subject to (i) all requirements and limitations, other than 24citizenship, to which other applicants are subject and (ii) 25the individual being authorized under federal law to obtain,   HB1776- 8 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1carry, or purchase or otherwise possess a firearm. The 2municipality may not charge or collect any fee from an 3applicant who has met all prequalification standards 4established by the municipality for any such position. With 5respect to a police department, a veteran shall be allowed to 6exceed the maximum age provision of this Section by the number 7of years served on active military duty, but by no more than 10 8years of active military duty. 9    (b) Residency requirements in effect at the time an 10individual enters the fire or police service of a municipality 11(other than a municipality that has more than 1,000,000 12inhabitants) cannot be made more restrictive for that 13individual during his period of service for that municipality, 14or be made a condition of promotion, except for the rank or 15position of Fire or Police Chief. 16    (c) No person with a record of misdemeanor convictions 17except those under Sections 11-1.50, 11-6, 11-7, 11-9, 11-14, 1811-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 11-30, 11-35, 12-2, 12-6, 12-15, 1914-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 31-4, 2031-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, and 32-8, subdivisions 21(a)(1) and (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, and paragraphs (1), 22(6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the Criminal 23Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrested for any 24cause but not convicted on that cause shall be disqualified 25from taking the examination to qualify for a position in the 26fire department on grounds of habits or moral character.  HB1776- 9 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1    (d) The age limitation in subsection (a) does not apply 2(i) to any person previously employed as a policeman or 3fireman in a regularly constituted police or fire department 4of (I) any municipality, regardless of whether the 5municipality is located in Illinois or in another state, or 6(II) a fire protection district whose obligations were assumed 7by a municipality under Section 21 of the Fire Protection 8District Act, (ii) to any person who has served a municipality 9as a regularly enrolled volunteer fireman for 5 years 10immediately preceding the time that municipality begins to use 11full time firemen to provide all or part of its fire protection 12service, or (iii) to any person who has served as an auxiliary 13police officer under Section 3.1-30-20 for at least 5 years 14and is under 40 years of age, (iv) to any person who has served 15as a deputy under Section 3-6008 of the Counties Code and 16otherwise meets necessary training requirements, or (v) to any 17person who has served as a sworn officer as a member of the 18Illinois State Police.19    (e) Applicants who are 20 years of age and who have 20successfully completed 2 years of law enforcement studies at 21an accredited college or university may be considered for 22appointment to active duty with the police department. An 23applicant described in this subsection (e) who is appointed to 24active duty shall not have power of arrest, nor shall the 25applicant be permitted to carry firearms, until he or she 26reaches 21 years of age.  HB1776- 10 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1    (f) Applicants who are 18 years of age and who have 2successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques, 3amounting to a total of 4 high school credits, within the cadet 4program of a municipality may be considered for appointment to 5active duty with the fire department of any municipality. 6    (g) The council or board of trustees may by ordinance 7provide that persons residing outside the municipality are 8eligible to take the examination. 9    (h) The examinations shall be practical in character and 10relate to those matters that will fairly test the capacity of 11the persons examined to discharge the duties of the positions 12to which they seek appointment. No person shall be appointed 13to the police or fire department if he or she does not possess 14a high school diploma or an equivalent high school education. 15A board of fire and police commissioners may, by its rules, 16require police applicants to have obtained an associate's 17degree or a bachelor's degree as a prerequisite for 18employment. The examinations shall include tests of physical 19qualifications and health. A board of fire and police 20commissioners may, by its rules, waive portions of the 21required examination for police applicants who have previously 22been full-time sworn officers of a regular police department 23in any municipal, county, university, or State law enforcement 24agency, provided they are certified by the Illinois Law 25Enforcement Training Standards Board and have been with their 26respective law enforcement agency within the State for at   HB1776- 11 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1least 2 years. No person shall be appointed to the police or 2fire department if he or she has suffered the amputation of any 3limb unless the applicant's duties will be only clerical or as 4a radio operator. No applicant shall be examined concerning 5his or her political or religious opinions or affiliations. 6The examinations shall be conducted by the board of fire and 7police commissioners of the municipality as provided in this 8Division 2.1.9    The requirement that a police applicant possess an 10associate's degree under this subsection may be waived if one 11or more of the following applies: (1) the applicant has served 12for 24 months of honorable active duty in the United States 13Armed Forces and has not been discharged dishonorably or under 14circumstances other than honorable; (2) the applicant has 15served for 180 days of active duty in the United States Armed 16Forces in combat duty recognized by the Department of Defense 17and has not been discharged dishonorably or under 18circumstances other than honorable; or (3) the applicant has 19successfully received credit for a minimum of 60 credit hours 20toward a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or 21university.22    The requirement that a police applicant possess a 23bachelor's degree under this subsection may be waived if one 24or more of the following applies: (1) the applicant has served 25for 36 months of honorable active duty in the United States 26Armed Forces and has not been discharged dishonorably or under   HB1776- 12 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1circumstances other than honorable or (2) the applicant has 2served for 180 days of active duty in the United States Armed 3Forces in combat duty recognized by the Department of Defense 4and has not been discharged dishonorably or under 5circumstances other than honorable. 6    (i) No person who is classified by his local selective 7service draft board as a conscientious objector, or who has 8ever been so classified, may be appointed to the police 9department.10    (j) No person shall be appointed to the police or fire 11department unless he or she is a person of good character and 12not an habitual drunkard, gambler, or a person who has been 13convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. No 14person, however, shall be disqualified from appointment to the 15fire department because of his or her record of misdemeanor 16convictions except those under Sections 11-1.50, 11-6, 11-7, 1711-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 11-30, 11-35, 12-2, 1812-6, 12-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 1931-1, 31-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, and 32-8, 20subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, and 21paragraphs (1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 22of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 23arrest for any cause without conviction on that cause. Any 24such person who is in the department may be removed on charges 25brought and after a trial as provided in this Division 2.1.26(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22;   HB1776- 13 -LRB104 09838 RTM 19906 b1103-357, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    Section 10. The Fire Protection District Act is amended by 3adding Section 16.06d as follows: 4    (70 ILCS 705/16.06d new)5    Sec. 16.06d. Applicants. An individual who is legally 6authorized to work in the United States under federal law is 7authorized to apply for the position of firefighter, subject 8to all requirements and limitations, other than citizenship, 9to which other applicants are subject. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 111, 2026.